Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 5. Refunding Bonds.

Sec. 29.47.300.
Authorization.

If a municipality has outstanding general obligation or revenue bonds and the governing body determines that it would be financially advantageous to refund the bonds, the municipality may provide by ordinance or resolution for the issuance of negotiable or nonnegotiable

general obligation refunding bonds; or

revenue refunding bonds.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.310.
Effect of refunding bonds.

The refunding bonds may take up and refund all or part of outstanding bonds at or before their maturity or redemption date.
The governing body may include various series and issues of bonds in a single issue of refunding bonds.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.320.
No election required.

An election is not required to authorize the issuance and sale of refunding bonds. Their issuance may be authorized and all proceedings with reference to them prescribed by ordinance. However, when it is desirable to use general obligation bonds to refund a revenue bond issue, the governing body shall call an election on the question.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.330.
Payment of refunding bonds.

General obligation refunding bonds are payable according to AS

29.47.200

. Revenue refunding bonds are payable according to AS

29.47.240

.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.47.340.
Sale of refunding bonds.

General obligation or revenue refunding bonds may, at the discretion of the governing body, be exchanged for the bonds being refunded, or may be sold at public or private sale. They may be issued and delivered at any time before the date of maturity or redemption of the refunded bonds.

History.

(§ 14 ch 74 SLA 1985)